Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-223
Municipality; joint agreements and action; authorized.

Any two or more municipalities may enter into agreements with each other, duly authorized by ordinance or resolution, as may be appropriate, for joint action pursuant to the provisions of sections 3-221 to 3-232. Concurrent action by the governing bodies of the municipalities involved shall constitute joint action.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 11(3), p. 165.

Two or more municipalities may agree with each other for joint action in establishing airport. Spencer v. Village of Wallace, 153 Neb. 536, 45 N.W.2d 473 (1951).